src/Morphotactics/Morphotactics.lexc
(лѣк)		 2/m;
(лѣк)		 r;
(лѣн)		 1;
(лѣн)		 2/a;
(лѣп)		 1;
(лѣп)		 2/a;
!(лѣпл҄)		 7;
(лѣс)		 2/m;
(лѣт)		 2/n;
(лѣт)		 1/f;
(лѧдв)		 r;
(лѧж)		 r;
(лѧк)		 4c;
(лѧц)		 3;
(лѫг)		 2/m;
(лѫж)		 r;
(лѫк)		 2/f;
(лѫк)		 2/m;
(лѫч)		 1;
(лѫщ)		 2/f;
(л҄уб)		 %0/f;
(л҄уб)		 1;
(л҄уб)		 2/a;
!(л҄убл҄)	 r;
(л҄ут)		 2/a;
(л҄ут)		 2/n;
(ма).н		 5; ! 534
(ма)		 3; ! 534
(ма).в		 3; ! 534
(маг)		 7;
(маз)		 3; ! 536
(маз).т		 1/f; ! 536
(маз).т.л	 2/n; ! 536
(мак)		 7;
(мал)		 AU;
!(мал҄)		 7;
(мар҄)		 7;
(мат)		 %0/f+;	! 540
(мат)		 RU;	! 540
(мат)		 7;
(мед)		 2/m;
(межд)		 2/f;
(мет)		 4c;
(меч)		 2/m;
(ми)		 5;
(мил)		 1;
(мил)		 2/a;
!(мил҄)		 r;
(мин)		 7a; ! 550
(мьн)		 2; ! 550
па.(мѧ).т	 1/f; ! 550
(мир)		 7;
(мир)		 2/m; ! 551
(мир)		 1; ! 551
!(мир҄)		 7; ! 551
(миѕ)		 7;
(млѣ)		 4hj; ! 553
(мла).т		 2/m; ! 553
(млад)		 2/a;
(млъв)		 1;
(мльк)		 5;
(мльн)		 r;
(мльч)		 2;
(млѣк)		 2/n;
(млѣч)		 r;
(мог)		 4c;
(мог).т		 1/f;
(мож)		 r;
(можд)		 r;
(мок).р		 2/a;
(мол)		 1;
!(мол҄)		 r;
((монист))	 2/n;
(мор)		 1;
(мор)		 2/m;
(мор҄)		 2/n;
(мост)		 2/m;
(мот).ыл	 2/f; ! 545
(мотр)		 1; ! 542
!(мотр҄)		 7; ! 542
!(матр҄)		 7; ! 542
((мотык))	 2/f;
(моч)		 1;
(мош).ьн	 2/f; ! 565
(мощр҄)		 r;
(мраз)		 1;
(мраз)		 2/m;
(мрак)		 2/m;
(мрач)		 1;
(мръз)		 uk; ! 566
(мръз)		 5; ! 566
(мрък)		 5;
(мрь).т		 1/f; ! 539
(мрь).т.в	 2/a; ! 539
((мрь.мрѣ))	 4h*↪;
(мрьц)		 7;
(мрѣ)		 4h*↪;
(мрѣж)		 2/f;
((мрѣкор)).ьj	 2/f;
(мух)		 2/f;
(мъд).ьл	 2/a; ! 572
(мък)		 5;
(мън)		 r;
((мъног))	 1;
((мъног))	 2/a;
(мъск)		 2/m;
(мъст)		 2/m;
(мъш)		 RU;	! 570 комар
(мы)		 4h*#↩;
(мыв)		 7;
(мысл)		 1;
(мысл)		 1/f;
(мысл)		 2/m;
(мыш)		 1/f;
!(мышл҄)		 r;
(мьзд)		 NU; ! 581
(мьн҄)		 r;
(мьст)		 1;
(мьст)		 1/f;
(мьч).ьт	 2/m; ! 584
!(мьщ)		 7;
из.(мѣ)		 4v; ! 586
съ.(мѣ)		 4v; ! 586
(мѣд)		 NU;
(мѣж)		 1;
(мѣл)		 2/m;
(мѣн)		 1; ! 550
(мѣн)		 1; ! 589
(мѣн)		 2/f; ! 589
!(мѣн҄)		 7; ! 589
(мѣр)		 2/f; ! 590
(мѣр)		 1; ! 590
!(мѣр҄)		 7; ! 590
(мѣс)		 1;
(мѣст)		 1;
(мѣст)		 2/n;
((мѣсѧц))	 2/m;
(мѣт)		 7;
(мѣх)		 2/m;
(мѣш)		 r;
(мѧк)		 5;
(мѧс)		 2/n;
(мѧт)		 4c;
(мѧч)		 1;
(мѫд)		 1;
(мѫдр)		 2/a; ! 600
!(мѫдр҄)		 7; ! 600
!(мѫждр҄)	 7; ! 600
(мѫж)		 2/m;
(мѫк)		 2/f;
(мѫт)		 1;
(мѫч)		 1;
!(мѫщ)		 7;
(наг)		 2/a;
(наж)		 1;
((наш))		 2/p;
(неб)		 %0/n;
((невод))	 2/m;
(нес)		 4c;
(ниж)		 in;
(низ)		 1;
(низ)		 2/m;
(низ)		 4c*↪;
(ник)		 5;
(ниц)		 2/a;
((ничьж))	 1;
(нищ)		 2/a;
(нов)		 2/a;	! 602
(ног)		 RU;	! 612
(нож)		 NU;	! 609
(ноз)		 1;
(нос)		 1;
(нос)		 2/m;
(нош)		 r;
(нощ)		 1/f;
(нрав)		 2/m;
(нур)		 1;
!(нур҄)		 r;
(ны)		 4v;
(нын҄).ѣ		 Adv;
(ныр)		 1;
(ныр)		 r;
(ньз)		 5;
(нѣм)		 2/a;
!(нѣмл҄)		 7;
(нѫд)		 1;
(нѫжд)		 2/f;
(н҄ив)		 2/f;
((оjьм))	 2/m;
(об).ьщ		 2/a; ! 623
(об).оj		 2/p; ! 624
((облаш))	 NU; ! 625
((обьд))	 2/n; ! 626
(ов).ьц		 2/f; ! 627
(ов).ьн		 2/m; ! 627
((овощ))	 2/n; ! 629
((овътор))	 1;
((огав)).ьj	 2/n; ! 630
(огн҄)		 NU;
(одр)		 2/m;
(ок)		 %0/n;
((окрин))	 2/m;
((олов))	 NU;
(он)		 2/p;
((онущ))	 2/f;
((опаш))	 1/f;
(ор)		 1; ! 12
(ор)		 3;
(ор).ьл		 2/m; ! 640
((орѫд))	 RU;	! 641
((орѫж))	 NU;	! 642
(ос).ьл		 2/m; ! 643
((оскръд))	 2/m;
(осм)		 1/f;
(осм)		 2/a;
(ост)		 NU;
(ост).р		 2/a;
(ост).р.ог	 2/m;
(от).ьц		 2/m; ! 647
((оцьт))	 2/m;
(оч)		 r;
(паj)		 7;
(пад)		 4c;
(пад).т		 1/f;
((пазнег))	 r;
((пазух))	 2/f;
(пак)		 AU;
(пал)		 1;
!(пал҄)		 7;
(пан)		 NU;
(пап)		 r;
((папрьт))	 2/m;
@D.ORIENT@(пас)		 4c;
(пек)		 4c∇;
((пелен))	 2/f;
((пепел))	 1;
((пепел))	 2/m;
(пер)		 1; ! 658
(пер).ьн	 N; ! 658
(печ)		 r;
((печат))	 1/m;
(пи)		 4h*↩;
(пи).р		 2/m;
(пил)		 2/f;
(пин)		 7a; ! 664
(пон)		 2/f; ! 664
(пон)		 2/m; ! 664
(пон҄).ав	 2/f; ! 664
(пѧ)		 4h; ! 664
(пѧ).д		 1/f; ! 664
(пѫ).т		 2/f; ! 664
(пир)		 7;
(пис)		 7;
(писк)		 3;
(пит)		 7;
(пищ)		 2/f;
(пла)		 5;
(плав)		 2/a;
(плав)		 7;
(плак)		 3;
(плат)		 1;
(плат)		 2/m;
(плач)		 NU;
(плащ)		 2/m;
(плед)		 menNeutra;
(плеск)		 3;
(плесн)		 2/n;
(плет)		 4c;
(плещ)		 2/n;
(плит)		 7;
(плищ)		 6;
(плод)		 %0/f;
(плод)		 1;
(плод)		 2/m;
(плот)		 2/m;
(плу)		 4h↩;
(плък)		 2/m;
(плът)		 1;
(плът)		 1/f;
(плъч)		 1;
(плъщ)		 r;
(пльз)		 2;
(пльз)		 3*;
(пльз)		 5;
(пльн)		 1; ! 684
(пльн)		 2/a; ! 684
!(пльн҄)		 7; ! 684
(плѣ)		 %0; ! 685
(плѣ).в		 2/f; ! 685
(плѣн)		 1; ! 686
(плѣн)		 2/m; ! 686
!(плѣн҄)		 7; ! 686
(плѣт)		 7;
(плѧс)		 3;
(пл҄и)		 r;
(пл҄у)		 5;
(пл҄ьв)		 3h*#;
(поj)		 1;
((поган))	 2/a;
((поган))	 2/m;
(под)		 r;
(позд)		 RU;	! 692
(пол)		 2/m;
((полат))	 2/f;
(пол҄)		 2/n;
(поп)		 2/m;
((попел))	 2/m;
((пород))	 2/f;
((посаг))	 5;
(пост)		 1;
(пост)		 2/m;
(пот)		 1;
(пот)		 2/m;
((потьпѣг))	 2/f;
(пощ)		 r;
(пра)		 r;
(прав)		 1;
(прав)		 2/a;
(праз).н	 1; ! 705
(праз).д.ьн	 2/a; ! 705
(прас)		 r;
(приj)		 7a;
(присн)		 2/a; ! 711 всегда, постоянно
((притран))	 2/a;
(про).к		 2/m; ! 713
(прос)		 1; ! 707
(прос)		 2/m; ! 707
!(прош)		 r; ! 707
!(праш)		 7; ! 707
(пращ)		 NU; ! 708 пращник
(прост)		 1; ! 709
(прост)		 2/a; ! 709
!(прощ)		 r; ! 709
(прот)		 RU;
(пръ)		 r;
(прът)		 2/m;
(прьв)		 2/a;
(прьс)		 1/f;
(прьст)		 2/m;
(прѣ)		 r;
((прѣгын҄))	 2/f;
(прѣм)		 in;
(прѣсн)		 AU;
(прѣт)		 1;
!(прѣщ)		 7;
(прѧг)		 4c; ! 724
!(прѫж)		 7; ! 724
(прѧд)		 4c;
(прѧд)		 5;
(прѧт)		 7;
(прѫг)		 2/m;
(прѫд)		 2/f; ! 728
(прѫд)		 2/m; ! 728
(прѫт)		 r;
(пуст)		 1;
(пуст)		 2/a;
!(пущ)		 7;
(пъв)		 7;
(път)		 RU;	! 732 птица
(пыт)		 1/f;
(пьj)		 r;
(пьр)		 3o*;
(пьр)		 2;
(пьр)		 3o*;
(пьр҄)		 2/m;
(пьс)		 3*;
(пьс)		 2/m;
((пьцьл))	 2/m;
(пьш).ен	 2/n; ! 736
(пьщ)		 r;
(пѣ)		 4h↩;
(пѣг)		 AU;
(пѣн)		 1;
(пѣн)		 2/f;
((пѣнѧѕ))	 2/m;
((пѣсн))	 1/f;
(пѣст)		 r;
(пѣш)		 2/a;
(пѧт)		 1/f; ! 746
(пѧт)		 2/a; ! 746
(пѫд)		 1;
(пѫт)		 1/m;
(ра)		 r;
(раj)		 2/m;
(раб)		 2/f;
(рав)		 RU;		! 751
(рад)		 2/a; ! 752
(рад)		 1; ! 753
(рад)		 2/f; ! 753
!(ражд)		 7; ! 753
(раз)		 1; ! 754
(раз)		 2/m; ! 754
!(раж)		 7; ! 754
(род)		 1; ! 755
(род)		 2/m; ! 755
!(рожд)		 r; ! 755
!(ражд)		 7; ! 755
(раз)		 r; ! 756
(рак)		 2/f;
(рам)		 2/n;
(ран)		 2/f;
(ран)		 2/a;
(раст)		 4c; ! 762
(раст).т.л	 1/f; ! 762
(рат)		 1/f;
(рач)		 1;
!(ращ)		 7;
(ребр)		 2/n;
(рек)		 4c∇;
(рем)		 r;
(рем)		 r;
(рет)		 1;
(рет)		 1/f;
(реч)		 r;
(ри)		 5;
(риг)		 5;
(риз)		 2/f;
(рик)		 7;
(риц)		 3;
(ров)		 2/m;
(рог)		 2/m;
((рогоз))	 NU;
(рож)		 r;
(розг)		 2/f; ! 776
(рожд)		 r; ! 776
((розвьн))	 2/m;
(рок)		 2/m;
(рос)		 1;
(роч)		 %0/n;
(роч)		 2/a;
(ру)		 4h↩;
(руш)		 1;
(ръв)		 3;
(ръжд)		 2/f;
(ръп).ът	 2/m; ! 784
(ры)		 4h*#↩;
(рыб)		 2/f;
(рыд)		 7;
(рьв).ьн	 2/a; ! 787
(рѣj)		 3;
(рѣд)		 uk;
(рѣз)		 3;
(рѣк)		 7;
(рѣп)		 RU; ! 789 репейник
(рѣсн)		 AU; ! 790 истина
(рѣт)		 %0;
(рѣч)		 1/f;
(рѣш)		 1;
(рѧд)		 1;
(рѧд)		 2/m;
(рѧщ)		 2/f;
(рѫг)		 2/m;
(рѫж)		 r;
(рѫк)		 2/f;
(рѫт)		 1;
(рѫч)		 1;
(с)			 r;
(с)			 r;
(сад)		 1;
(сад)		 2/m;
!(сажд)		 7;
(сам)		 2/p;
(сам)		 r;
(сан)		 2/m;
((сапог))	 2/m;
(св)		 r;
(свар)		 2/m;
(свекр)		 %0/f;
((сверѣп))	 2/a;
(свир)		 VU;
(свит)		 7;
((свобод))	 1;
((свобод))	 2/f;
!((свобожд)) r;
!((свобажд)) 7;
(свраб)		 VU;	! 812 вызывающий зуд, зудящий, свербящий
(свьт)		 2;
(свѣт)		 1;
(свѣт)		 2/m;
(свѣщ)		 2/f;
(свѧд)		 5;
!(свѧт)		 1; ! 813
(свѧт)		 2/a; ! 813
!(свѧщ)		 7; ! 813
(седм)		 1/f;
(седм)		 2/a;
(сек).ыр	 2/f; ! 815
((сел))		 r;
(сел)		 1;
(сел)		 2/n;
!(сел҄)		 r;
(сет)		 NU;
(си)		 r;
(сиj)		 7;
(сил)		 2/f;
!(сил҄)		 7;
(син҄)		 7a; ! 822
(сир)		 2/a;
(скак)		 3;
(сквар)		 2/f;
(сквож)		 r;
(скврь)		 RU;
(скврѣ)		 4h*↪;
(склаб)		 1;
!(склабл҄)	 r;
((сковрад))	 2/f;
(скоп)		 1;
(скоп)		 r;
(скор)		 2/a;
(скот)		 2/m;
(скоч)		 1;
((скрижал))	 1/f;
(скрин҄)	 2/f;
(скръб)		 1;
(скръб)		 1/f;
(скръб)		 2;
(скрьж).ьт	 2/m; ! 837
((скълѧѕ))	 2/m;
!(скѫд)		 1; ! 840
(скѫд)		 2/a; ! 840
((скѫдъл))	 NU;	! 841 
(скѫп)		 AU;
(сла).н		 2/a;	! 842
(сла).д		 uk;	! 842
(сла).д.т	 1/f;	! 842
(слаб)		 2/a;
(слаб)		 2/f;
(слав)		 2/f;
((сланут))	 r;
(слин)		 2/f;
(слов)		 %0/n;
(слон)		 NU;
(слу)		 4h↩;
(слу).х		 2/m;
(слуг)		 2/f;
(слуз)		 2/m;
(слън)		 RU;	! 852
(слы).ш		 2;
(сльз)		 r;
(сльз)		 1;
(сльп)		 r;
(слѣд)		 NU;
(слѣп)		 2/a;
(смиj)		 3*;
(смик)		 7;
(смок)		 %0/f;
!(смрад)	 1; ! 861
(смрад)		 2/m; ! 861
(смръд)		 2; ! 861
(смрьд)		 2/m;
(смѣ)		 r;
(смѣ).х		 2/m;
(снов)		 3o;
(сноп)		 2/m;
(сныв)		 7;
(снѣг)		 NU;
(соб)		 1;
(сов)		 7;
(сок)		 2/m;
((сокач))	 r;
(сол)		 NU;
(соп)		 r;
(сох)		 2/f;
(спод)		 2/m;
((спол))	 r;
(спѣ)		 4v;
(спѣ).х		 2/m;
(спѫд)		 2/m;
(срам)		 2/m;	! 874 позор, срам
(срач)		 RU;	! 875 рубашка, нижняя одежда
(срьд)		 RU;
(срѣд)		 2/f;
(ста)		 %0;
(ста).в		 1;
(ста).н		 2/m; ! 879
(стар)		 2/a;
(стел҄)		 2/f;
(стен)		 3;
(степ)		 r;
(стиг)		 5;
(стиж)		 r;
(стлъп)		 2/m;
(сто)		 2; ! 879
(сто).л		 2/m; ! 879
(стра).н	 2/f; ! 888
(стра).н	 2/a; ! 888
(страб)		 1;
(страд)		 3;
(страд).т	 1/f;
(страж)		 2/f;
(страж)		 2/m;
(страх)		 2/m;
(страш)		 r;
(стриг)		 7;
(стриж)		 r;
(стриѕ)		 7;
(строj)		 1;
(строj)		 2/m;
(стров)		 2/m;
(строп)		 2/m;
(стру)		 2/f;
(струj)		 1;
(струп)		 2/m;
(стръг)		 3*;
(стръп)		 r;
(стрьк)		 2/m;
(стрьм)		 1;
!(стрьмл҄)	 r;
(стрѣ)		 4h*↪;
(стрѣ)		 r;
(стрѣ).х	 2/f;
(стрѣг)		 4c;
(стрѣг)		 4c*↪;
(стрѣк)		 3;
(стрѣл)		 1;
(стрѣл)		 2/f;
!(стрѣл҄)	 7;
(студ)		 1;
(студ)		 2/m;	! 905 стыд; позор, стыд, бесчестье
(студ)		 RU;	! 905 холодный
(стыд)		 uk;
(стьбл)		 r;
(стьг).н	 2/f; ! 886
(стькл)		 NU; ! 907
(стьл)		 3*;
(стѣн)		 2/f;
(стѫп)		 1;
(стѫп)		 2/m;
!(стѫпл҄)	 r;
(су)		 5;
(суj)		 2/a;
(сул҄)		 r;
(сур)		 r;
(сух)		 1; ! 914
(сух)		 2/a; ! 914
(суш)		 2/f; ! 914
(съл)		 2/m;
(съл)		 3;
(съп)		 %0;
(съп)		 1;
(съп).н		 1;
(със)		 2/m;
(със)		 3o;
(сът)		 2/n;
(съх)		 5;
(сыл)		 7;
(сын)		 2/m;
(сын)		 r;
(сын҄)		 7;
(сып)		 3;
(сып)		 7;
(сыр)		 1;
(сыр)		 2/a;
(сыт)		 1;
(сыт)		 1/f;
(сыт)		 2/a;
(сыщ)		 r;
((сьребр))	 1;
((сьребр))	 2/n;
(сѣ)		 r;
(сѣ)		 4v;
((сѣвер))	 2/m;
(сѣд)		 %0;
(сѣд)		 2/a;
(сѣк)		 4c;
(сѣл҄)		 7;
(сѣн)		 1;
(сѣн)		 r;
(сѣн҄)		 7;
(сѣт)		 1; ! 931
(сѣт)		 6; ! 932
(сѣк)		 VU;
(сѣщ)		 r;
((сѧ))		 %0/s;
(сѧг)		 4c;
(сѧж)		 r;
(сѧк)		 5;
(сѧѕ)		 7;
(сѫд)		 2/m;
(сѫд)		 1;
(сѫд)		 2/m;
!(сѫжд)		 7;
(сѫк)		 2/m;
(сѫч)		 1;
(сѫч)		 r;
(т)			 r;
(та)		 1;
(таj)		 1;
(таj)		 3;
(так)		 r;
(тап)		 7;
(тапл҄)		 7;
(тач)		 7;
(тв)		 r;
((твор))	 1; ! 89
!((твор҄))	 r; ! 89
((твор))	 2/m; ! 89
((твар҄))	 7; ! 89
(твор)		 1; ! 944
(твор)		 2/m; ! 944
!(твор҄)		 r; ! 944
(твар)		 1/f; ! 944
!(твар҄)		 7; ! 944
(тврьд)		 1;
(тврьд)		 1/f;
(тврьд)		 2/a;
!(тврьжд)	 7;
(тек)		 4c∇;
(тел)		 RU;	! 946
(теп)		 4c;
(тепл)		 AU;
(тес)		 3;
(тет).ък	 2/f; ! 950
(теч)		 2/f;
(тик)		 2/m;
(тим).н		 2/f; ! 952
(тин)		 1/f;
(тир)		 7;
(тис)		 2/f;
(тиск)		 7;
(тих)		 AU; ! 957
(тлап)		 1;
(тлък)		 2/m;
(тльк)		 5;
(тлѣк)		 4c*↪;
(ток)		 2/m;
((тол))		 r;
(тол)		 1;
(том)		 1;
!(томл҄)		 r;
(топ)		 1;
(топ)		 2/m;
(топ)		 5;
(топл)		 2/a;
(точ)		 1;
(тр)		 r;
(трав)		 1;
(трат)		 3;
((трепет))	 2/m;
((трепет))	 3;
((тризн))	 2/f;
(тров)		 r;
(трош)		 1;
(тру)		 4h↩;
(труд)		 1;
(труд)		 2/m;
!(тружд)	 7;
(труп)		 2/m;
((тръ.тър))	 7;
(тръг)		 5;
(тръг)		 2/m;
(тръж)		 r;
(тръх)		 r;
(трь)		 4hj;
(трьн)		 2/m;
(трьп)		 2;
(трьст)		 1/f;
(трьѕ)		 3*;
(трѣб)		 1;
(трѣб)		 2/f;
!(трѣбл҄)	 7;
(трѣбл҄)	 r;
(трѣзв)		 1;
(трѣзв)		 2/a;
(трѧс)		 4c;
(трѫб)		 2/f;
(трѫд)		 2/m;
(трѫс)		 2/m;
(трѫт)		 2/m;
(тужд)		 2/a;
(тук)		 2/m;	! 989 жир
(тул)		 2/m;	! 990 колчан
(тур)		 2/m;	! 991 дикий бык, тур
(тък)		 2/a;
(тък)		 2/m;
(тък)		 3o;
(тък)		 5;
(тъм)		 2/f;
(тъч)		 2/f;
(тъч)		 r;
!(тъщ)		 1; ! 996
(тъщ)		 2/a; ! 996
(тъщ)		 2; ! 997
((ты))		 %0/s;
(тык)		 7;
(тыс)		 r;
(тьл)		 1;
(тьл)		 2/a;
(тьл҄)		 2/f;
(тьм)		 NU; ! 1002
(тьст)		 1/m;
(тьщ)		 2/f;
(тѣк)		 7;
(тѣл)		 %0/n;
(тѣсн)		 2/a;
(тѣх)		 2/f;
(тѣш)		 r;
(тѣщ)		 1;
(тѧг)		 ik;
(тѧт).ив	 2/f; ! 1007
(тѧѕ)		 7;
(тѫг)		 2/f;
(тѫж)		 1;
(тѫт).ьн	 2/m; ! 1008 звук, шум
(тѫч)		 2/f;
(у)			 4v∇;
(уд)		 2/m;
(уз)		 NU; ! 1012
(узд)		 2/f;
((укроп))	 2/m;
(ум)		 1;
(ум)		 7e;
(ум)		 2/m;
(умл҄)		 2/a;
(ун҄)		 1;
(усм).н.ьj	 NU;
(уст)		 1;
(утр)		 2/n;
(утр).ѣ		 Adv;
(ух)		 %0/n;
(уч)		 1;
(уш)		 1;
!(ущ)		 7;
((халѫг))	 2/f;
(хап)		 3;
(хвал)		 1;
